Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1401DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1401DP (3) 91
dg/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 135C.40, subsection 1, paragraph d,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a
process to review each deficient practice identified by the
department for which a citation may be issued to a nursing
facility for immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of care
prior to issuance of final findings under section 135C.40A.
Representatives of the nursing facility issued such a citation
may participate in the review to provide context and or
evidence for the department to consider in determining if a
final finding of immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of
care should be issued. The review shall ensure consistent and
accurate application of federal and state inspection protocols
and defined regulatory standards.